Idaho, session 2026, S1355.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 13, Title 50, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 50-1335, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
50-1335. SUBDIVISION REQUIREMENTS -- EXEMPTION. Provided that the
method of sale or other disposition is not adopted for the purpose of evading
the provisions of this chapter, and subject to any requirements that may
be adopted by the board of county commissioners regarding documentation of
the proper use and implementation of the provisions of this section, this
chapter shall not apply to a division of land made outside of platted subdi-
visions for the purpose of a single gift or sale to a member of a landowner's
immediate family, subject to the following requirements:
(1) A member of the immediate family is limited to any person who is a
natural or adopted child, stepchild, spouse, sibling, grandchild, grandpar-
ent, or parent of the landowner;
(2) The purpose of the division is to provide for the housing, business,
or agricultural needs of the grantee;
(3) The land shall have been titled in the name of the grantor, or in the
name of a trust controlled by the grantor, for a combined period prior to the
division of no less than five (5) years for land titled before July 1, 2026,
or ten (10) years for land titled on or after July 1, 2026. Parcels created
under this section shall be titled in the name of the immediate family member
for whom the division is made for a period of no less than five (5) years, or
for no less than one (1) year if the parcel was created before July 1, 2026,
unless the parcels are subject to involuntary transfer, including but not
limited to foreclosure, death, judicial sale, condemnation, or bankruptcy;
(4) No parcel smaller than five (5) acres created under this section
shall be further divided unless the owner obtains a subdivision permit pur-
suant to this chapter; and
(5) Where the landowner is a business entity and eighty percent (80%) of
the ownership interest or shares in the business entity are held by, or in the
name of a trust controlled by, individuals related by blood or marriage, the
sale or gift may be made subject to the provisions of this section to an im-
mediate family member of any shareholder who has owned at least five percent
(5%) of the outstanding shares for at least five (5) years continuously be-
fore the date of the sale or gift.


SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.